Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.030

Representatives of employee organization—Right to collective bargaining.

Representatives of an employee organization, which organization shall by secret ballot have won a majority in an election to represent the academic employees within its college district, shall have the right to bargain.

[ 2019 c 230 s 3; 1991 c 238 s 147; 1987 c 314 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 28B.52.020.